Maryland, session 2025, HB0527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–718.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PURPLE LINE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
2–103.8 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THE SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A PROGRAM TO PROVIDE:
(1) FOR THE FIRST 3 MONTHS MONTH AFTER TRANSIT SERVICE ON
THE PURPLE LINE BEGINS, RIDERSHIP ON PURPLE LINE TRANSIT VEHICLES AT NO
COST TO INDIVIDUALS RESIDING WITHIN A ONE–QUARTER–MILE RADIUS OF THE
PURPLE LINE TRACK; AND
(2) ADVERTISING SPACE ON PURPLE LINE TRANSIT VEHICLES AND
AT PURPLE LINE TRANSIT STATIONS BEGINNING ON OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND UNTIL
3 MONTHS AFTER TRANSIT SERVICE ON THE PURPLE LINE BEGINS, PROMOTIONAL
MATERIALS AND SERVICES AT NO COST TO SMALL BUSINESSES, AS DEFINED IN §
– 1 –

Ch. 494 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2–1505.2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, LOCATED WITHIN A
ONE–QUARTER–MILE RADIUS OF THE PURPLE LINE TRACK.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL USE INTERNAL RESOURCES IT HAS
AVAILABLE TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) WEBSITES MAINTAINED BY THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(2) THE PRINTING AND DESIGN SERVICES OF THE ADMINISTRATION.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE
ADMINISTRATION TO PROCURE PRIVATE ADVERTISING OR MARKETING SERVICES.
(E) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –